Utah statutes.
57-1-22.5.   Notice of assignment of beneficial interest.

(1)  A recorded notice of assignment of a beneficial interest, executed by the assigning beneficiary, is prima facie evidence of an assignment of the trust deed as described in the notice.

(2)  The notice of assignment of a beneficial interest shall:

(a)  state:

(i)  the names of the original parties to the trust deed;

(ii)  the date the trust deed was recorded;

(iii) (A)  the book and page where the trust deed is recorded; or

(B)  the entry number where the trust deed is recorded;

(iv)  the legal description of the trust property; and

(v)  the name and address of the new beneficiary; and

(b)  be in substantially the following form:

Notice of Assignment of Beneficial Interest

The undersigned hereby gives notice that it assigned and transferred all of its rights, title, and interest under the trust deed described below, together with all of the indebtedness secured thereby, to

(insert name and address of current beneficiary)

The trust deed was executed by ______ as trustor, in which ______ was the named beneficiary, ______ was the named trustee, and it was filed for record ______ (month/date/year), (in Book __, Page ____, Records of  ______ County Recorder)/(as entry No. ______, _______ County), Utah.  This notice of assignment of beneficial interest affects the property located in ___________________ County, State of Utah, and is described more specifically as follows:

(insert legal description)

Dated ___________________

Signature __________________________

(Certificate of Acknowledgment)



Enacted by Chapter 208, 2013 General Session

